Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
CHAPTER 4 Firefighter Standards and Training

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1242, §§ 1 and 2, as enacted, purported to amend the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Act (Ga. L. 1971, p. 693) which was codified as Art. 1 of this chapter. However, since it has been determined that the 1980 Act, which dealt with airport firefighters, was intended to be a new Act rather than an amendment to the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Act, the 1980 Act was codified as Art. 2 of this chapter, which was repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 619, § 4/SB 308, effective July 1, 2005.

Former Article 2, concerning airport firefighters, consisted of Code Sections 25-4-30 and 25-4-31, and was based on Ga. L. 1980, p. 1242, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1493, § 5; Ga. L. 1995, p. 341, § 7. The former article was repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 619, § 4/SB 308, effective July 1, 2005.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, the Article 1 designation was deleted.

Cross references.

Liability of officers and agents for acts performed while fighting fires or performing duties at the scene of emergencies, § 51-1-30.

25-4-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 693, § 1.

25-4-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Airport” means any airport located in this state which has regularly scheduled commercial air carrier service or commuter airline service as required for certification under Section 139.49 of the Federal Aviation Administration regulations.

“Airport firefighter” means any person assigned to any airport located in this state who performs the duties of aircraft fire fighting or rescue.

“Candidate” means a prospective firefighter who has not yet been certified by the council as having met the requirements of this chapter.

“Certified firefighter” or “state certified firefighter” means any firefighter who has been certified by the council as having met the requirements of this chapter.

“Council” means the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council.

(5.1)

“Fire department” shall have the same meaning as provided in Code Section 25-3-21.

“Firefighter” means a recruit or a trained individual who is a full-time employee, part-time employee, or volunteer for a municipal, county, state, or private incorporated fire department and as such has duties of responding to mitigate a variety of emergency and nonemergency situations where life, property, or the environment is at risk, which may include without limitation fire suppression; fire prevention activities; emergency medical services; hazardous materials response and preparedness; technical rescue operations; search and rescue; disaster management and preparedness; community service activities; response to civil disturbances and terrorism incidents; nonemergency functions including training, preplanning, communications, maintenance, and physical conditioning; and other related emergency and nonemergency duties as may be assigned or required; provided, however, that a firefighter’s assignments may vary based on geographic, climatic, and demographic conditions or other factors including training, experience, and ability.

“Full-time” means employed for compensation on a basis of at least 40 hours per week by any municipal, county, state, or private incorporated fire department.

“Part-time” means employed for compensation on less than a full-time basis by any municipal, county, state, or private incorporated fire department.

(8.1)

“Recruit” means a prospective firefighter who has not yet been certified or registered by the council as having met the requirements of Code Section 25-4-8 and the rules and regulations to be a firefighter as provided for by the council.

“Volunteer” means not employed for compensation on an hourly or salaried basis, but appointed and regularly enrolled to serve as a firefighter for any municipal, county, state, or private incorporated fire department.

“Volunteer council” means the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council established by Code Section 25-4-3.1.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 693, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 373, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 888, § 4; Ga. L. 2005, p. 619, § 1/SB 308; Ga. L. 2008, p. 243, § 2/SB 414; Ga. L. 2016, p. 64, § 2/HB 727; Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 4/SB 342.

The 2016 amendment,

effective April 26, 2016, inserted “a recruit or” near the beginning of paragraph (6); and added paragraph (8.1).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “‘on an hourly or salaried basis,” for “by” in paragraph (9) and added paragraph (10).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1242, § 1 purported to amend this Code section. However, since it has been determined that the 1980 Act, which dealt with airport firefighters, was intended to be a new Act (see Editor’s note at Art. 2 of this chapter), § 1 of the 1980 Act was codified at §

25-4-30

, which was subsequently repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 619, § 4/SB 308, effective July 1, 2005.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 243, § 1/SB 414, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘2008 Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U.L. Rev. 55 (2016).

25-4-3.
Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council; establishment and organization; advisory committee; expenses and allowances.

The Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council is established. The council shall be composed of 11 members, one of whom shall be the Safety Fire Commissioner or the designated representative of the Safety Fire Commissioner. Two members shall be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor. Two members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The remaining six members shall be appointed by the Governor subject to the following requirements:

One member shall be a member of the governing authority of a county;

One member shall be a member of the governing authority of a municipality;

One member shall be a city or county manager;

One member shall be the chief of a county or municipal fire department; and

Two members shall be state certified firefighter training officers.

The members of the council appointed by the Governor pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed at the sole discretion of the Governor. However, the Governor may consider for appointment to the council persons suggested for membership thereon as follows:

The Association County Commissioners of Georgia may suggest the names of three persons for each appointment pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section;

The Georgia Municipal Association may suggest the names of three persons for each appointment pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section;

The Georgia City and County Management Association may suggest the names of three persons for each appointment pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section;

The Georgia Association of Fire Chiefs may suggest the names of three persons for each appointment pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section; and

The Executive Board of the Georgia State Firemen’s Association may suggest the names of three persons for each appointment pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

The first members of the council appointed by the Governor pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed to take office on January 1, 1986. The two members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed for initial terms of one year, the two members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed for initial terms of two years, and the two members appointed pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed for initial terms of three years. Thereafter, successors shall be appointed for terms of three years as the respective terms of office expire.

The members appointed by the Lieutenant Governor and the members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each serve for terms concurrent with terms of members of the General Assembly.

All members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. In the event of a vacancy in the membership of the council for any reason, including ceasing to hold an office or position required for membership on the council, the Governor shall fill such vacancy for the unexpired term; except that a vacancy in either of those members of the council appointed by the Lieutenant Governor or the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. In order for the Governor to consider the names of persons suggested for membership on the council pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, such names must be submitted to the Governor by the respective organizations at least 60 days but not more than 90 days prior to the expiration of the respective terms of office or prior to the appointment of the initial members of the council who take office on January 1, 1986. The Governor shall be authorized, but not required, to request the appropriate organization designated in subsection (b) of this Code section to suggest the names of three persons for the Governor’s consideration in making an appointment to fill a vacancy.

At the first regular meeting of the council held in each even-numbered year, the council shall elect a chairperson and such other officers from its own membership as it deems necessary to serve until successors are elected by the council as provided in this subsection.

The council may, from time to time, designate an advisory committee of not more than three members to assist and advise the council in carrying out its duties under this chapter. The members of any such advisory committee shall serve at the pleasure of the council.

Each member of the council and each member of an advisory committee of the council, in carrying out their official duties, shall be entitled to receive the same expense and mileage allowance authorized for members of professional licensing boards by subsection (f) of Code Section 43-1-2. The funds for such expenses and allowances shall be paid from funds appropriated or available to the Department of Public Safety.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 693, § 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1725, § 9; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1493, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 25; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1706, § 19; Ga. L. 2003, p. 888, § 5; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 25; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 25/HB 90.

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “11 members” for “eleven members” in the second sentence of the introductory paragraph of subsection (a).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Organization of Georgia Firefighters Minimum Standards Council and the minimum standards and qualifications of firefighters, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council, Chapters 205-1-1 and 205-2-1.

25-4-3.1.
Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council; establishment as division of council; membership; officers; expenses.

There is established the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council which shall serve as a division of the council. The volunteer council shall possess all powers, rights, and duties as set forth by this article and shall not be considered an advisory committee as set forth in subsection (e) of Code Section 25-4-3. The volunteer council shall be composed of seven members, all of which shall be members of volunteer fire departments that are otherwise not participants in the paid fire service unless in the capacity as a paid local fire chief in a jurisdiction with all volunteer firefighters. Two members shall be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor. Two members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The remaining three members shall be appointed by the Governor.

The members of the volunteer council appointed by the Governor pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed at the sole discretion of the Governor; provided, however, that the Governor may consider for such appointments persons suggested for membership thereon as follows:

The Association County Commissioners of Georgia may suggest the names of three persons;

The Georgia Municipal Association may suggest the names of three persons;

The Georgia Association of Fire Chiefs may suggest the names of three persons; and

The Executive Board of the Georgia State Firefighters Association may suggest the names of three persons.

The first members of the volunteer council appointed pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed to take office on January 1, 2021. The two members appointed by the Lieutenant Governor shall be appointed for initial terms of one year, the two members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be appointed for initial terms of two years, and the three members appointed by the Governor shall be appointed for initial terms of three years. Thereafter, successors shall be appointed for terms of three years as their respective terms of office expire.

All members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. In the event of a vacancy in the membership of the volunteer council for any reason, including ceasing to meet the qualifications required pursuant subsection (a) of this Code section, the Governor shall fill such vacancy for the unexpired term; provided, however, that a vacancy in those members of the volunteer council appointed by the Lieutenant Governor or the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. In order for the Governor to consider the names of persons suggested for membership on the volunteer council pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, such names must be submitted to the Governor by the respective organizations at least 60 days but not more than 90 days prior to the expiration of the respective terms of office or prior to the appointment of the initial members of the volunteer council who take office on January 1, 2021. The Governor shall be authorized, but not required, to request the appropriate organization designated in subsection (b) of this Code section to suggest the names of three persons for the Governor’s consideration in making an appointment to fill a vacancy.

At the first regular meeting of the volunteer council held in each odd-numbered year, the volunteer council shall elect a chairperson and such other officers from its own membership as it deems necessary to serve until successors are elected by the volunteer council as provided in this Code section.

The volunteer council may, from time to time, designate an advisory committee to assist and advise the volunteer council in carrying out its duties under this article. The members of any such advisory committee shall serve at the pleasure of the volunteer council.

Each member of the volunteer council and each member of an advisory committee of the volunteer council, in carrying out their official duties, shall be entitled to receive the same expense and mileage allowance authorized for members of professional licensing boards by subsection (f) of Code Section 43-1-2. The funds for such expenses and allowances shall be paid from funds appropriated or available to the Department of Public Safety.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-4-3.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 5/SB 342.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

25-4-4.
Eligibility of council and volunteer council members for public office.

Membership on the council or volunteer council does not constitute public office, and no member shall be disqualified from holding public office by reason of his or her membership.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 693, § 4; Ga. L. 1977, p. 549, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 6/SB 342.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “or volunteer council” and “or her”.

25-4-5.
Administrative assignment to Department of Public Safety; source of funds; authority to accept gifts and other items of value.

The council and volunteer council are assigned to the Department of Public Safety for administrative purposes. The funds necessary to carry out this chapter shall come from funds appropriated to and available to the council and volunteer council and from any other available funds. The council and volunteer council are authorized to accept and use gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The council and volunteer council are also authorized to accept and use property, both real and personal, and services for the purpose of carrying out this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 693, § 4; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1725, § 9; Ga. L. 1977, p. 549, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 7/SB 342.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “and volunteer council are” for “is” three times; inserted “and volunteer council” in the second sentence; and substituted “article”” for “chapter” at the end of the last sentence.

Cross references.

Assignment for administrative purposes, §

50-4-3

.

25-4-6.
Meetings, quorum, and annual reporting of council and volunteer council.

The business of the council shall be conducted in the following manner:

The council shall hold at least two regular meetings each year at the call of the chairperson or upon the written request of six members of the council. Six members of the council shall constitute a quorum. The council shall adopt such rules for the transaction of its business as it shall desire and may appoint such committees as it considers necessary to carry out its business and duties; and

The council shall make an annual report of its activities to the Governor and to the General Assembly and shall include in the report its recommendations for appropriate legislation. The council shall not be required to distribute copies of the annual report to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the report in the manner which it deems to be most effective and efficient.

The business of the volunteer council shall be conducted in the following manner:

The volunteer council shall hold at least two regular meetings each year at the call of the chairperson or upon written request of four members of the volunteer council. Four members of the volunteer council shall constitute a quorum. The volunteer council shall adopt such rules for the transaction of its business as it shall desire and may appoint such committees as it considers necessary to carry out its business and duties; and

The volunteer council shall make an annual report of its activities to the Governor and to the General Assembly and shall include in the report its recommendations for appropriate legislation. The volunteer council shall not be required to distribute copies of the annual report to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the report in the manner which it deems to be most effective and efficient.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 693, § 5; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1493, § 3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 21/SB 49; Ga. L. 2008, p. 243, § 3/SB 414; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 25/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 8/SB 342.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 243, § 1/SB 414, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘2008 Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council Act.’ ”

25-4-7.
Functions and powers of council and volunteer council.

The council is vested with the following functions and powers:

To promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of the council;

To provide rules of procedure for its internal management and control;

To enter into contracts or do such things as may be necessary and incidental to the administration of its authority pursuant to this chapter;

To establish uniform minimum standards for the employment and training of full-time firefighters, part-time firefighters, airport firefighters, fire and life safety educators, fire inspectors, fire investigators, and other such firefighting service professionals as determined by the council, including qualifications, certifications, recertifications, decertifications, and probations for certified individuals and suspensions for noncertified individuals, and requirements, which are consistent with this chapter;

To establish minimum curriculum requirements for schools operated by or for any employing agency for the specific purpose of training firefighter recruits or full-time firefighters, part-time firefighters, airport firefighters, fire and life safety educators, fire inspectors, and fire investigators;

To approve institutions and facilities for school operation by or for any employing agency for the specific purpose of training full-time and part-time firefighters and full-time and part-time firefighter recruits, including airport firefighters;

To make or support studies on any aspect of firefighter education and training or recruitment;

To make recommendations concerning any matter within its purview;

To establish basic firefighter training requirements for full-time, part-time, and contract firefighters, including airport firefighters;

To certify any person satisfactorily complying with the training program established in accordance with paragraph (9) of this subsection and the qualifications for employment covered in this chapter; and

To issue a certificate to any person who has received training in another state or who has received training as a federal firefighter by the United States government, when the council has determined that the training was at least equivalent to that required by the council for approved firefighter education and training programs in this state and when the person has satisfactorily complied with all other requirements of this chapter.

The volunteer council is vested with the following functions and powers:

To promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of the volunteer council;

To provide rules of procedure for its internal management and control;

To enter into contracts or do such things as may be necessary and incidental to the administration of its authority pursuant to this chapter;

To establish uniform minimum standards for the training of volunteer firefighters, including qualifications, certifications, and requirements, which are consistent with this chapter;

To make or support studies on any aspect of firefighter education and training or recruitment;

To make recommendations concerning any matter within its purview;

To establish basic firefighter training requirements for volunteer firefighters;

To certify any person satisfactorily complying with the training program established in accordance with paragraph (7) of this subsection and the qualifications for serving as a volunteer firefighter covered in this chapter; and

To issue a certificate to any person who has received training in another state or who has received training as a federal firefighter by the United States government, when the volunteer council has determined that the training was at least equivalent to that required by the volunteer council for approved volunteer firefighter education and training programs in this state and when the person has satisfactorily complied with all other requirements of this chapter.

All rules and regulations promulgated by the volunteer council may be overturned by a two-thirds’ vote of the council. In such instance, the rule or regulation shall be returned to the volunteer council for reconsideration.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 693, § 6; Ga. L. 2003, p. 888, § 6; Ga. L. 2005, p. 619, § 2/SB 308; Ga. L. 2008, p. 243, § 4/SB 414; Ga. L. 2016, p. 64, § 3/HB 727; Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 9/SB 342.

The 2016 amendment,

effective April 26, 2016, substituted “fire inspectors, fire investigators, and other such firefighting service professionals as determined by the council” for “fire inspectors, and fire investigators,” in the middle of paragraph (4); and inserted “contract,” in paragraph (9).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a); substituted “firefighters, part-time firefighters,” for “part-time or volunteer firefighters” in paragraphs (a)(4) and (a)(5); inserted a comma following “council” in paragraph (a)(4); inserted “full-time and part-time” twice in paragraph (a)(6); substituted “firefighter” for “fire-fighting” in paragraph (a)(7); substituted “and contract firefighters” for “contract, and volunteer firefighters” in paragraph (a)(9); substituted “subsection” for “Code section” in paragraph (a)(10); and added subsections (b) and (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 243, § 1/SB 414, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘2008 Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U.L. Rev. 55 (2016).

25-4-7.1.
Appointment and compensation of executive director; assistants.

The council, in conjunction with the volunteer council, shall appoint and establish the compensation of an executive director who shall serve at the pleasure of the council.

The executive director may contract for such services and employ such other professional, technical, and clerical personnel as may be necessary and convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The executive director shall provide the same services in support of the volunteer council as provided to the council.

The executive director shall bring all issues involving volunteer firefighters and volunteer fire departments to the volunteer council.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-4-7.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 888, § 7; Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 10/SB 342.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added “, in conjunction with the volunteer council,” near the beginning of subsection (a) and added subsections (c) and (d).

25-4-8.
Qualifications of firefighters generally.

Except as provided in Code Section 25-4-12, any employee, volunteer, or private contractor of a fire department operating in this state or certified as a firefighter shall, as prescribed by the council:

Be at least 18 years of age;

Not have been convicted of, or pleaded guilty to, a felony in any jurisdiction or of a crime which if committed in this state would constitute a felony under the laws of this state within ten years prior to employment, provided that a person who has been convicted of a felony more than five but less than ten years prior to employment may be certified and employed as a firefighter when the person has:

Successfully completed a training program following the Georgia Fire Academy curriculum and sponsored by the Department of Corrections pursuant to Code Section 42-5-57;

Been recommended to a fire department by the proper authorities at the institution at which the training program was undertaken; and

Met all other requirements as set forth in this chapter.

The council shall be the final authority with respect to authorizing the employment, appointment, and certification of a person who has been convicted of a felony more than five but less than ten years prior to seeking employment when the person is seeking employment as a firefighter for any municipal, county, or state fire department which employs three or more firefighters who work a minimum of 40 hours per week and has the responsibility of preventing and suppressing fires, protecting life and property, and enforcing municipal, county, and state codes, as well as enforcing any law pertaining to the prevention and control of fires;

Have a good moral character as determined by investigation under procedure approved by the council;

Be fingerprinted and a search made of local, state, and national fingerprint files to disclose any criminal record;

Be in good physical condition as determined by a medical examination and successfully pass the minimum physical agility requirements as established by the council; and

Possess or achieve within 12 months after employment a high school diploma or a state approved high school equivalency (HSE) diploma, provided that the council may by rule or regulation prescribe for the waiver of such requirement.

For the purposes of this Code section, a person shall be deemed to have been convicted of a crime if such person shall have pleaded guilty to a charge thereof before a court or federal magistrate or shall have been found guilty thereof by the decision or judgment of a court or federal magistrate or by the verdict of a jury, irrespective of the pronouncement of sentence or the suspension thereof, unless such plea of guilty or such decision, judgment, or verdict shall have been set aside, reversed, or otherwise abrogated by lawful judicial process or unless the person convicted of the crime shall have received a pardon therefor from the President of the United States or the governor or other pardoning authority in the jurisdiction where the conviction was had or shall have received a certificate of good conduct granted by the State Board of Pardons and Paroles pursuant to the provisions of law to remove a disability under law because of such conviction. Any person convicted of a felony while he or she is a certified firefighter shall have his or her certification revoked.

For the purposes of making determinations relating to eligibility under this Code section, a local fire department shall provide information relative to prospective employees to the local law enforcement agency and a state fire department shall provide information relative to prospective employees to a state law enforcement agency. Such local or state law enforcement agency shall be authorized to obtain conviction data with respect to such prospective employees of a local or state fire department as authorized in this subsection. The local or state law enforcement agency shall submit to the Georgia Crime Information Center two complete sets of fingerprints of the applicant for appointment or employment, the required records search fees, and such other information as may be required. Upon receipt thereof, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall promptly transmit one set of fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall retain the other set and promptly conduct a search of its own records and records to which it has access. The Georgia Crime Information Center shall notify the local or state law enforcement agency in writing of any derogatory finding, including, but not limited to, any conviction data regarding the fingerprint records check or if there is no such finding. All conviction data received by the local or state law enforcement agency shall not be a public record, shall be privileged, and shall not be disclosed to any other person or agency except as provided in this subsection and except to any person or agency which otherwise has a legal right to inspect the employment file. All such records shall be maintained by the local or state law enforcement agency pursuant to laws regarding such records and the rules and regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Georgia Crime Information Center, as applicable. As used in this subsection, “conviction data” means a record of a finding or verdict of guilty or plea of guilty or plea of nolo contendere with regard to any crime, regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has been sought.

The local or state law enforcement agency shall provide to the chief of the fire department which requested information on an applicant any criminal data indicating that the applicant was convicted of a felony. Such information may be provided to the council. The provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection relating to privileged information and records of conviction data shall apply to any information provided by a law enforcement agency to a fire department.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 693, § 7; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1224, § 7; Ga. L. 1980, p. 601, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 989, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 18; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 325, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 243, § 5/SB 414; Ga. L. 2012, p. 83, § 1/HB 247; Ga. L. 2016, p. 64, § 4/HB 727; Ga. L. 2018, p. 202, § 1/HB 699; Ga. L. 2021, p. 782, § 1/SB 46; Ga. L. 2022, p. 168, § 6/SB 397.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in subsection (b), deleted “of paragraph (2) of subsection (a)” preceding “of this Code section” near the beginning of the first sentence, and added the last sentence; and deleted “paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of” preceding “this Code section” in the first sentence of paragraph (c)(1).

The 2016 amendment,

effective April 26, 2016, substituted the present provisions of subsection (a) for the former provisions, which read: “Except as provided in Code Section 25-4-12, any person employed or certified as a firefighter shall:”; inserted “, or pleaded guilty to,” near the beginning of paragraph (a)(2); and, in the ending paragraph following subparagraph (a)(2)(C), substituted “the employment, appointment, and certification” for “employment and certification”.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added the proviso at the end of paragraph (a)(6).

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, added “pursuant to Code Section 42-5-57” at the end of subparagraph (a)(2)(A).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “state approved high school equivalency (HSE) diploma” for “general education development equivalency” in paragraph (a)(6).

Cross references.

Qualifications of peace officers generally, §

35-8-8

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 243, § 1/SB 414, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘2008 Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U.L. Rev. 55 (2016).

25-4-8.1.
Qualifications for volunteer firefighters.

Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 25-4-12, any person volunteering at a volunteer fire department as a volunteer firefighter shall, as prescribed by the volunteer council:

Be at least 18 years of age;

Not have been convicted of, or pleaded guilty to, a felony in any jurisdiction or of a crime which if committed in this state would constitute a felony under the laws of this state within ten years prior to volunteering, provided that a person who has been convicted of a felony more than five but less than ten years prior to volunteering may be registered as a volunteer firefighter when the person has:

Successfully completed a training program following the Georgia Fire Academy curriculum and sponsored by the Department of Corrections;

Been recommended to a volunteer fire department by the proper authorities at the institution at which the training program was undertaken; and

Met all other requirements for a volunteer firefighter as set forth in this chapter.

For the purposes of this Code section, a person shall be deemed to have been convicted of a crime if such person shall have pleaded guilty to a charge thereof before a court or federal magistrate or shall have been found guilty thereof by the decision or judgment of a court or federal magistrate or by the verdict of a jury, irrespective of the pronouncement of sentence or the suspension thereof, unless such plea of guilty or such decision, judgment, or verdict shall have been set aside, reversed, or otherwise abrogated by lawful judicial process or unless the person convicted of the crime shall have received a pardon therefor from the President of the United States or the governor or other pardoning authority in the jurisdiction where the conviction was had or shall have received a certificate of good conduct granted by the State Board of Pardons and Paroles pursuant to the provisions of law to remove a disability under law because of such conviction. Any person convicted of a felony while he or she is a registered volunteer firefighter shall have his or her registration revoked.

For purposes of making determinations relating to eligibility under this Code section, a local volunteer fire department shall provide information relative to prospective volunteers to the local law enforcement agency or other agency having access to the Georgia Crime Information Center for a search to determine if the prospective volunteer has been convicted of a felony in Georgia. Such local agency shall be authorized to obtain conviction data with respect to such prospective volunteers of a local volunteer fire department as authorized in this subsection. All conviction data received by the local agency shall not be a public record, shall be privileged, and shall not be disclosed to any other person or agency except as provided in this subsection and except to any person or agency which otherwise has a legal right to inspect the file. All such records shall be maintained by the local agency pursuant to laws regarding such records and the rules and regulations of the Georgia Crime Information Center, as applicable. As used in this subsection, “conviction data” means a record of a finding or verdict of guilty or plea of guilty or plea of nolo contendere with regard to any crime, regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has been sought.

The volunteer council shall create a form upon which may be indicated only whether the prospective volunteer was convicted of a felony or has no felony convictions. The local agency shall complete such form and shall provide same to the chief of the fire department which requested information on a prospective volunteer. Such information may be provided to the volunteer council. The provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection relating to privileged information and records of conviction data shall apply to any information provided by a local agency to a local volunteer fire department.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-4-8.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 11/SB 342.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, Code Section 24-5-8.1, as enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 11/SB 342, was redesignated as Code Section 25-4-8.1.